Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-1312
Sections, how construed.

Sections 13-1301 to 13-1312 are supplemental to existing statutes and shall not be construed as repealing or amending existing statutes but shall be construed harmoniously and implemented compatibly with them.

Laws 1971, LB 1003, § 12;

R.S.1943, (1983), § 23-2612.